Illinois, session 104th, HB5419.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Finance Authority Act is amended 5by changing Section 830-20 as follows: 6    (20 ILCS 3501/830-20)7    Sec. 830-20. The Authority may not pass a resolution 8authorizing the issuance of any notes or bonds in excess of 9$450,000 for any one agricultural real estate borrower. In any 10calendar year after 2007, the $450,000 amount shall be 11increased by an amount equal to such dollar amount multiplied 12by the inflation percentage determined under Section 305(c) of 13the federal Consolidated Farm and Rural Development Act (7 14U.S.C. 1925) as of June 18, 2008, unless a higher amount is 15permitted by statute or regulation. Any increase determined 16under the preceding sentence shall be rounded to the nearest 17multiple of $100. No proceeds from any bonds issued by the 18Authority shall be loaned to any natural person who has a net 19worth in excess of $500,000 for the purchase of new 20depreciable agricultural property or to any agribusiness that, 21including all affiliates and subsidiaries, has more than 100 22employees and a gross income exceeding $2,000,000 for the 23preceding calendar year; provided, however, that the employee   HB5419- 2 -LRB104 20257 HLH 33708 b1size and gross income limitations shall not apply to any loans 2to agribusinesses for research and development purposes, and 3provided further that the Authority shall retain the power to 4waive such limitations for any agribusiness that, at the time 5of application, does not operate a facility within this State.6(Source: P.A. 96-531, eff. 8-14-09.) 7    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 8becoming law.